Vermont, session 2025-2026, H597.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. RENEWABLE ENERGY DEVELOPMENT AND EXISTING
INFRASTRUCTURE; REPORT
The Public Utility Commission shall study and report on how to expedite
renewable energy development by examining municipal and regional preferred
sites identified in enhanced energy plans and their proximity to existing energy
distribution and transmission infrastructure. The report shall analyze to what
extent developing preferred sites that are closer in proximity to existing energy
infrastructure could result in the creation of more renewable energy facilities
VT LEG #386243 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.597
2026 Page 2 of 2
on a shorter timescale. The Chair shall submit the report to the House
Committee on Energy and Digital Infrastructure and the Senate Committee on
Natural Resources and Energy on or before January 15, 2027.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386243 v.2